Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201979-9,120
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Public Employees Retirement Board develop a work plan, recommendations, cost estimates, and cost comparisons regarding the transfer of management of any Class V school employees retirement system established under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act and which existed on January 1, 2019, to the Public Employees Retirement Board.

Laws 2019, LB31, § 2.